Hawaii statutes.
§26-14.6 Department of public safety.
(a) The department of public safety shall be headed by a single executive to
be known as the director of public safety.

(b) The department of public safety shall be
responsible for the formulation and implementation of state policies and
objectives for correctional, security, law enforcement, and public safety
programs and functions, for the administration and maintenance of all public or
private correctional facilities and services, for the service of process, and
for the security of state buildings.

(c) Effective July 1, 1990, the Hawaii paroling authority and the crime victim compensation commission are placed within
the department of public safety for administrative purposes only.

(d) Effective July 1, 1990, the functions and
authority heretofore exercised by:

(1) The department of corrections relating to adult
corrections and the intake service centers;

(2) The judiciary relating to the sheriff's office
and judiciary security personnel; and

(3) The department of the attorney general relating
to state law enforcement officers and narcotics enforcement investigators with
the narcotics enforcement division,

shall be transferred to the department of public
safety.

(e) Effective July 1, 1990, the functions and
authority heretofore exercised by the department of health pursuant to chapters
329 and 329C, with the exception of sections 329-2, 329-3, and 329-4(3) to (8),
shall be transferred to the department of public safety.

(f) Effective July 1, 1990, the functions,
authority, and obligations, together with the limitations imposed thereon and
the privileges and immunities conferred thereby, exercised by a "sheriff",
"sheriffs", a "sheriff's deputy", "sheriff's deputies",
a "deputy sheriff", "deputy sheriffs", or a "deputy",
under sections 21-8, 47-18, 105-4, 134-51, 183D-11, 187A-14, 231-25, 281-108,
281-111, 286-52, 286-52.5, 321-1, 322-6, 325-9, 353-11, 356D-54, 356D-94,
383-71, 438-5, 445-37, 482E-4, 485A-202, 501-42, 501-171, 501-218, 521-78,
578-4, 584-6, 587-33, 603-29, 604-6.2, 606-14, 607-2, 607-4, 607-8, 633-8,
634-11, 634-12, 634-21, 634-22, 651-33, 651-37, 651-51, 654-2, 655-2, 657-13,
660-16, 666-11, 666-21, 803-23, 803-34, 803-35, 804-14, 804-18, 804-41, 805-1,
806-71, and 832-23 shall be exercised to the same extent by the department of
public safety.

(g) Effective January 1, 1993, the functions
and authority heretofore exercised by the attorney general and the department
of the attorney general relating to the executive security officers shall be
transferred to the department of public safety.

(h) Effective July 1, 1999, the functions and
authority heretofore exercised by the director of public safety and the
department of public safety relating to after hours security contracts at
department of education facilities, except for the security functions being
performed by employees of the public library system as well as the contractual
security services for the libraries, shall be transferred to the department of
education.

(i) Effective January 1, 1993, the functions
and authority heretofore exercised by the director of health and the department
of health relating to uniformed security employees and security contracts at
various state hospitals throughout the State shall be transferred to the department
of public safety. Effective July 1, 2005, the functions, authority, and
employee positions of the department of public safety relating to uniformed
security employees and security contracts at health facilities that are under
the operation, management, and control of the Hawaii health systems corporation
shall be transferred to the Hawaii health systems corporation.

(j) Effective January 1, 1993, the functions
and authority heretofore exercised by the director of human services and the
department of human services relating to contractual security guard services
shall be transferred to the department of public safety.

(k) Effective July 1, 1994, the functions and
authority heretofore exercised by the adjutant general relating to security for
national guard and state emergency management facilities in the Diamond Head
complex, for after work hours, shall be transferred to the department of public
safety.

(l) Effective July 1, 2002, the functions and
authority heretofore exercised by the director of public safety and the
department of public safety relating to after hours security contracts at
department of education facilities, including all security functions being
performed by employees of the public library system, as well as the contractual
security services for the libraries, shall be transferred to the department of
education and the public library system as appropriate. [L 1989, c 211, §2; am
L 1990, c 281, §2; am L 1991, c 114, §1; am L 1992, c 146, §3; am L 1993, c 6,
§4; am L 1994, c 154, §2; am L 1995, c 58, §1; am L 1996, c 128, §2; am L 1998,
c 11, §1, c 227, §3, and c 240, §6; am L 1999, c 134, §1; am L 2002, c 44, §2;
am L 2004, c 44, §§26, 33; am L 2005, c 61, §2; am L 2006, c 229, §3; am L
2007, c 249, §§3, 4; am L 2014, c 111, §28]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next